Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5294XS (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2090 Section 1. Section 279.8, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. The board shall make rules for its own government and 3 that of the directors, officers, employees, teachers and 4 pupils, and for the care of the schoolhouse, grounds, and 5 property of the school corporation, and shall aid in the 6 enforcement of the rules, and require the performance of duties 7 imposed by law and the rules. The board shall annually elect a 8 chief executive officer of the board, and the superintendent 9 shall not serve as the chief executive officer of the board. 10 The board shall include in its rules provisions regulating 11 the loading and unloading of pupils from a school bus stopped 12 on the highway during a period of reduced highway visibility 13 caused by fog, snow or other weather conditions. The board 14 shall have the authority to include in its rules provisions 15 allowing school corporation employees to use school credit 16 cards to pay for the actual and necessary expenses incurred in 17 the performance of work-related duties. 18 Sec. 2. Section 279.20, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 1. The board of directors of a school district may employ 21 a superintendent of schools for a term of not to exceed 22 three years. However, the boardâs initial contract with a 23 superintendent shall not exceed one year if the board is 24 obligated to pay a former superintendent under an unexpired 25 contract. The superintendent shall be the executive officer of 26 the board and have such powers and duties as may be prescribed 27 by rules adopted by the board or by law. Boards of directors 28 may jointly exercise the powers conferred by this section . 29 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Audit of school district 30 spending. 31 If a resident of a school district or an employee of a 32 school district believes that the school district is improperly 33 spending school district moneys, the resident or employee may 34 report the improper spending to the county auditor of the 35 -1- LSB 5294XS (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 2090 county in which the school districtâs central administrative 1 office is located and request that the county auditor audit the 2 school districtâs financial condition and transactions. 3